Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1841.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3205(a) and (d) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3205. Informed consent.[(a) General rule.--No abortion shall be performed or induced except with the voluntary and informed consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed or induced. Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion is voluntary and informed if and only if:(1) At least 24 hours prior to the abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion or the referring physician has orally informed the woman of:(i) The nature of the proposed procedure or 123456789101112131415161718 treatment and of those risks and alternatives to the procedure or treatment that a reasonable patient would consider material to the decision of whether or not to undergo the abortion.(ii) The probable gestational age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is to be performed.(iii) The medical risks associated with carrying her child to term.(2) At least 24 hours prior to the abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion or the referring physician, or a qualified physician assistant, health care practitioner, technician or social worker to whom the responsibility has been delegated by either physician, has informed the pregnant woman that:(i) The department publishes printed materials which describe the unborn child and list agencies which offer alternatives to abortion and that she has a right to review the printed materials and that a copy will be provided to her free of charge if she chooses to review it.(ii) Medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal care, childbirth and neonatal care, and that more detailed information on the availability of such assistance is contained in the printed materials published by the department.(iii) The father of the unborn child is liable to assist in the support of her child, even in instances where he has offered to pay for the abortion. In the case of rape, this information may be omitted.(3) A copy of the printed materials has been provided to 20250HB1841PN2277 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the pregnant woman if she chooses to view these materials.(4) The pregnant woman certifies in writing, prior to the abortion, that the information required to be provided under paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) has been provided.](a.1) Requirements.--No abortion shall be performed in this Commonwealth except with the voluntary and informed consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed. Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion is voluntary and informed only if:(1) (i) The woman is told the following, by telephone or in person, by the physician who is to perform the abortion, by a qualified agent of the physician who is to perform the abortion, by a qualified agent of a referring physician or by a referring physician, at least 24 hours before the abortion:(A) the particular medical risks to the individual patient associated with the particular abortion procedure to be employed, when medically accurate;(B) the probable gestational age and presence of a detectable human heartbeat of an unborn child at the time the abortion would be performed; and(C) the medical risks associated with carrying an unborn child to term.(ii) The information required by subparagraph (i) may be provided by telephone without conducting a physical examination or tests of the woman, in which case the information required to be provided may be based on facts supplied to the physician by the woman and any other relevant information reasonably available to the 20250HB1841PN2277 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 physician. The information may not be provided by a tape recording but shall be provided during a consultation in which the physician or a qualified agent of the physician is able to ask questions of the woman and the woman is able to ask questions of the physician or the physician's qualified agent. If in the medical judgment of the physician any physical examination, tests or other information subsequently provided to the physician requires a revision of the information previously supplied to the woman, the revised information must be communicated to the woman prior to the performance of the abortion. Nothing in this section may be construed to preclude provision of required information in a language understood by the woman through a translator.(2) (i) The woman is informed, by telephone or in person, by the physician who is to perform the abortion, by a referring physician or by a qualified agent of the physician who is to perform the abortion at least 24 hours before the abortion:(A) That medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal care, childbirth and neonatal care.(B) That the father will be liable to assist in the support of her child.(C) How to obtain a list of health care providers, facilities and clinics that offer to perform ultrasounds free of charge. The list shall be arranged geographically and include the name, address, hours of operation and telephone number of each listed entity.20250HB1841PN2277 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) That she has the right to review the materials described in section 3208.2 (relating to medical education) and that the materials are available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The physician or the physician's qualified agent shall orally inform the woman that materials have been provided by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. If the woman chooses to view the materials other than on the website, the materials shall either be given to her at least 24 hours before the abortion or mailed to her at least 72 hours before the abortion by certified mail, restricted delivery to addressee.(ii) The information required by subparagraph (i) may be provided by a tape recording if provision is made to record or otherwise register specifically whether the woman does or does not choose to review the printed materials other than on the website.(3) The woman certifies in writing, prior to the abortion, that the information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) has been furnished to her and that she has been informed of her opportunity to review the information referred to in paragraph (2).(4) The woman receives an ultrasound at least 48 hours prior to undergoing an abortion or a pre-abortion screen subject to the following:(i) At the conclusion of the ultrasound, the woman is offered the opportunity to view the fetal image and hear the fetal heartbeat. The active ultrasound image shall be of a quality consistent with standard medical 20250HB1841PN2277 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practice in the community, contain the dimensions of the unborn child and accurately portray the presence of external members and internal organs, including the heartbeat, if present or viewable, of the unborn child. The auscultation of fetal heart tone shall be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community.(ii) At the conclusion of the action described in subparagraph (i) and prior to the abortion, the woman certifies in writing that:(A) she was provided the opportunity described in subparagraph (i);(B) whether or not she elected to view the sonogram; and(C) whether or not she elected to listen to the fetal heartbeat, if present.(5) Prior to performing the abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion, or the physician's qualified agent:(i) receives a copy of the certifications prescribed by paragraphs (3) and (4); and(ii) retains the certifications on file with the woman's medical record for at least three years following the date of receipt.* * *(d) Limitation on civil liability.--Any physician who complies with the provisions of this section may not be held civilly liable to his patient for failure to obtain informed consent to the abortion within the meaning of that term as defined by the act of [October 15, 1975 (P.L.390, No.111), known 20250HB1841PN2277 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as the Health Care Services Malpractice Act.] March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.(e) List.--The department shall prepare a geographically indexed list of health care providers, facilities and clinics that perform ultrasounds which provide ultrasound images and shall separately list health care providers, facilities and clinics that offer ultrasound services free of charge. The list shall contain contact information for each provider, facility or clinic, including telephone numbers, physical addresses and Internet website addresses. The physician performing the abortion, or a designated representative of the physician, shall provide the list to the woman without charge.Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3208.2. Medical education.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall create a video and other materials that in terms understandable to a reasonable person describe:(1) The Commonwealth's abortion laws and acts that do and do not constitute an abortion.(2) For acts described under paragraph (1) that:(i) Miscarriage care is not an abortion.(ii) Ectopic pregnancy care is not an abortion.(iii) A premature delivery of an unborn child for the purposes of preserving the life or health of the mother is not an abortion, even if the procedure results in the inadvertent death of the unborn child.(3) The most common medical conditions that threaten the life or health of a pregnant woman.(4) The generally accepted standards of care applicable 20250HB1841PN2277 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the treatment of a pregnant woman experiencing life-threatening or health-threatening medical conditions.(5) The criteria that a health care practitioner, exercising reasonable medical judgment, might use in determining the best course of treatment for a pregnant woman experiencing life-threatening or health-threatening medical conditions and for her unborn child.(b) Duty to consult with Attorney General and stakeholders.--In creating the video and other materials described in subsection (a), the department shall consult with the Attorney General and stakeholders having medical and legal expertise. Upon completion, the department shall make the video and materials available without charge on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1841PN2277 - 8 - 123456789101112131415